Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.110

Information and research services.

For the purpose of obtaining information on school organization, administration, operation, finance and instruction, school districts and educational service districts may contract for or purchase information and research services from public universities, colleges and other public bodies, or from private individuals or agencies. For the same purpose, school districts and educational service district superintendents may become members of any nonprofit organization whose principal purpose is to provide such services. Charges payable for such services and membership fees payable to such organizations may be based on the cost of providing such services, on the benefit received by the participating school districts measured by enrollment, or on any other reasonable basis, and may be paid before, during, or after the receipt of such services or the participation as members of such organizations.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 112; 1971 ex.s. c 93 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 142; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.530. Prior: 1963 c 30 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.530, 28.58.530.]

NOTES:

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.